Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2705
License requirements.

To be eligible to be licensed as a perfusionist, an applicant shall fulfill the following requirements:

(1) Submit evidence of successful completion of a perfusion education program with standards established by the Accreditation Committee for Perfusion Education and approved by the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs or a program with substantially equivalent education standards approved by the board; and

(2) Submit evidence of successful completion of the certification examinations offered by the American Board of Cardiovascular Perfusion, or its successor, or a substantially equivalent examination approved by the board.

Laws 2007, LB236, § 12;

R.S.Supp.,2007, § 71-1,394;

Laws 2007, LB247, § 77.

Credentialing, general requirements and issuance procedures, see section 38-121 et seq.